praksid/praks8/Veskimae_kodutoo8/veskimae6.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

+S ! Nimisõna
+A ! Omadussõna
+V ! Tegusõna
+P ! Asesõna
+N ! Arvsõna
+Adv ! Määrsõna
+I ! Hüüdsõna
+C ! Sidesõna
+Adp ! Kaassõna

+Sg
+Pl

+Nom ! Nimetav
+Gen ! Omastav
+Part ! Osastav
+Ill ! Sisseütlev
+Ine ! Seesütlev
+Ela ! Seestütlev
+All ! Alaleütlev
+Ade ! Alalütlev
+Abl ! Alaltütlev
+Trl ! Saav
+Ter ! Rajav
+Ess ! Olev
+Abe ! Ilmaütlev
+Com ! Kaasaütlev



%>                ! morfeemi piir
%{NA%}            ! nõrk aste
%#		  ! liitsõna piir	

KK1		! kk või k
PP1		! pp või p
TT1		! tt või t

K1		! k või g
B1		! b või null
T1		! t või d
S1		! s või null
G1		! g või null

Definitions

C = [ b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|r|s|t|v ] ;
V = [ a|e|i|o|u|õ|ä|ö|ü ] ;
L = V | C ;

LEXICON Root

Nimisonad ;
Omadussonad ;
Oletused ;

LEXICON Nimisonad

Annika+S: Annika tüüp_annika "weight: 5 " ; 
Randla+S: Randla tüüp_annika "weight: 5 " ;
Tartu+S: Tartu tüüp_annika "weight: 5 " ;
kett+S: keTT1 tüüp_kett "weight: 5 " ;
luba+S: luB1a tüüp_luba "weight: 5 ";
riik+S: riiK1 tüüp_riik "weight: 5 " ;
süsi+S: süS1 tüüp_süsi "weight: 5 " ;
vesi+S: veS1 tüüp_vesi "weight: 5 " ;
krae+S: krae tüüp_krae "weight: 5 ";


LEXICON Omadussonad

kena+A: ken tüüp_kena "weight: 5 " ;
suur+A: suur tüüp_suur "weight: 5 " ;

LEXICON Oletused

< [V C C] ::10 "+S":0 > tüüp_kett ;        
< [C V C*] ::10 "+S":0 > tüüp_riik ;      
< [C C V V] ::10 "+S":0 > tüüp_krae ;        
< V V C ::10 "+S":0 > tüüp_riik ;            
< C V C V ::10 "+S":0 > tüüp_luba ;         
< C V V C V C ::10 "+S":0 > tüüp_suur ; 


LEXICON tüüp_annika

  +Sg+Nom: gi_ki_liide ;
 +Sg+Nom%#: Nimisonad "weight: 20 " ;
 +Sg+Nom%#: Omadussonad "weight: 20 " ;
	 :%> sg_gen_jt ;
 +Sg+Part:%>t gi_ki_liide "weight: 1 ";
      +Pl:%>te semkäänded ;
 +Pl+Part:%>id gi_ki_liide ;

LEXICON tüüp_suur
  +Sg+Nom:%> gi_ki_liide ;
 +Sg+Nom%#: Nimisonad "weight: 20 ";
 +Sg+Nom%#: Omadussonad "weight: 20 ";
	 :%>e sg_gen_jt ;
 +Sg+Part:%>t gi_ki_liide "weight: 1 " ;
      +Pl:%>te semkäänded ;
 +Pl+Part:%>i gi_ki_liide ;

LEXICON tüüp_kena
  +Sg+Nom:%>a gi_ki_liide ;
 +Sg+Nom%#:%>a Nimisonad "weight: 20 ";
 +Sg+Nom%#:%>a Omadussonad "weight: 20 ";
         :%{NA%}%>a sg_gen_jt ;
 +Sg+Part:%>a gi_ki_liide "weight: 1 ";
      +Pl:%>ade semkäänded ;
+Pl+Part:%>asid gi_ki_liide ;

LEXICON tüüp_kett 
  +Sg+Nom: gi_ki_liide ;
 +Sg+Nom%#: Nimisonad "weight: 20 " ;
 +Sg+Nom%#: Omadussonad "weight: 20 " ;
         :%{NA%}i sg_gen_jt ;
 +Sg+Part:%i gi_ki_liide "weight: 1 ";
      +Pl:%>ide semkäänded ;
 +Pl+Part:%>e gi_ki_liide ;

LEXICON tüüp_luba
  +Sg+Nom: gi_ki_liide ;
 +Sg+Nom%#: Nimisonad "weight: 20 " ;
 +Sg+Nom%#: Omadussonad "weight: 20 " ;
         :%{NA%} sg_gen_jt ;
 +Sg+Part: gi_ki_liide "weight: 1 ";
      +Pl:%de semkäänded ;
 +Pl+Part:%sid gi_ki_liide ;

LEXICON tüüp_riik
  +Sg+Nom: gi_ki_liide ;
 +Sg+Nom%#: Nimisonad "weight: 20 " ;
 +Sg+Nom%#: Omadussonad "weight: 20 " ;
         :%{NA%}%>i sg_gen_jt ;
 +Sg+Part:%>i gi_ki_liide "weight: 1 " ;
      +Pl:%>ide semkäänded ;
 +Pl+Part:%>e gi_ki_liide ;

LEXICON tüüp_süsi
  +Sg+Nom:%>i gi_ki_liide ;
 +Sg+Nom%#:%>i Nimisonad "weight: 20 " ;
 +Sg+Nom%#:%>i Omadussonad "weight: 20 " ;
         :%{NA%}%>e sg_gen_jt ;
 +Sg+Part:%{NA%}%>tt gi_ki_liide "weight: 1 " ;
      +Pl:%{NA%}%>te semkäänded ;
 +Pl+Part:%>i gi_ki_liide ;

LEXICON tüüp_vesi
 +Sg+Nom:%>i gi_ki_liide ;
 +Sg+Nom%#:%>i Nimisonad "weight: 20 " ;
 +Sg+Nom%#:%>i Omadussonad "weight: 20 " ;
         :%{NA%}%>e sg_gen_jt ;
 +Sg+Part:%{NA%}%>tt gi_ki_liide "weight: 1 ";
      +Pl:%{NA%}%>te semkäänded ;
 +Pl+Part:%>i gi_ki_liide ;

LEXICON tüüp_krae
   +Sg+Nom:%> gi_ki_liide ;
 +Sg+Nom%#:%> Nimisonad "weight: 20 " ;
 +Sg+Nom%#:%> Omadussonad "weight: 20 " ;
          :%> sg_gen_jt ;
  +Sg+Part:%>d gi_ki_liide "weight: 1 " ;
       +Pl:%>d semkäänded ;
  +Pl+Part:%>esid gi_ki_liide ;

LEXICON sg_gen_jt

         +Sg+Gen: gi_ki_liide ;
       +Sg+Gen:%# Nimisonad ;
       +Sg+Gen:%# Omadussonad ;
             +Sg: semkäänded ;
         +Pl+Nom:%>d gi_ki_liide ;

LEXICON 2C

  : sg_gen_jt ; 
  +Sg+Par:%>t gi_ki_liide ;
  +Pl:%>te semkäänded ;
  +Pl+Par:%>id gi_ki_liide ;

LEXICON semkäänded

	+Gen: gi_ki_liide "weight: 2 " ;
	+Ill: %>sse gi_ki_liide "weight: 2 " ;
	+Ine: %>s gi_ki_liide "weight: 2 " ;
	+Ela: %>st gi_ki_liide "weight: 2 " ;
	+All: %>le gi_ki_liide "weight: 2 " ;
	+Ade: %>l gi_ki_liide "weight: 2 ";
	+Abl: %>lt gi_ki_liide "weight: 2 " ;
	+Trl: %>ks gi_ki_liide "weight: 2 " ;
	+Ter: %>ni gi_ki_liide "weight: 2 " ;
	+Ess: %>na gi_ki_liide "weight: 2 " ;
	+Abe: %>ta gi_ki_liide "weight: 2 ";
	+Com: %>ga gi_ki_liide "weight: 2 ";

LEXICON  gi_ki_liide
	 +gi_ki_liide:%>gi # ;
	 : # ; ! kui gi või ki puudub
